sl-SI: Sorta jama: Afriška; Kitajska (nagaimo); Slonova noga; Japonska (satsumaimo); Korejska; Vijolična (ube); Vodna; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
hu: Yam fajtája: Afrikai; Kínai (nagaimo); Elefántláb; Japán (satsumaimo); Koreai; Lila (ube); Víz; Fehér; Sárga; Egyéb
pl: Odmiana pochrzynu: Afrykański; Chiński (nagaimo); Pochrzyn słoniowy; Japoński (satsumaimo); Koreański; Fioletowy (ube); Wodny; Biały; Żółty; Inne
nl: Yamvariëteit: Afrikaanse; Chinese (nagaimo); Olifantenvoet; Japanse (satsumaimo); Koreaanse; Paars (ube); Water; Wit; Geel; Overig
cs: Odrůda jamů: Africký; Čínský (nagaimo); Sloní noha; Japonský (satsumaimo); Korejský; Purpurový (ube); Vodní; Bílý; Žlutý; Jiné
lt-LT: Jamsų veislė: Afrikinis; Kininis (nagaimo); Dramblio pėdos; Japoninis (satsumaimo); Korėjietiškas; Violetinis (ube); Vandeninis; Baltas; Geltonas; Kita
sk-SK: Odroda koreňa yam: Africký; Čínsky (nagaimo); Slonia noha; Japonský (satsumaimo); Kórejský; Fialový (ube); Vodný; Biely; Žltý; Iné
da: Yamvariant: Afrikansk; Kinesisk (nagaimo); Elefantfod; Japansk (satsumaimo); Koreansk; Lilla (ube); Vand; Hvid; Gul; Andet
el: Ποικιλία γιαμ: Αφρικανικό; Κινεζικό (nagaimo); Πόδι ελέφαντα; Ιαπωνικό (satsumaimo); Κορεάτικο; Μωβ (ube); Νερού; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
vi: Giống khoai mỡ: Khoai mỡ châu Phi; Khoai mỡ Trung Quốc (nagaimo); Khoai nưa (Elephant foot); Khoai lang Nhật (satsumaimo); Khoai mỡ Hàn Quốc; Khoai lang tím (ube); Khoai mỡ nước; Khoai mỡ trắng; Khoai mỡ vàng; Khác
th: พันธุ์มันเทศ: แอฟริกัน; จีน (นากาอิโมะ); บุกช้าง; ญี่ปุ่น (ซัตสึมาอิโมะ); เกาหลี; ม่วง (อูเบะ); มันเสา (Water); สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Soi de ignamă: African; Chinezesc (nagaimo); Picior de elefant; Japonez (satsumaimo); Coreean; Violet (ube); De apă; Alb; Galben; Altele
ja: ヤムイモの種類: アフリカン; 中国 (長芋); ゾウコンニャク; 日本 (サツマイモ); 韓国; 紫 (ウベ); ウォーター; 白; 黄色; その他
sv: Jamsrotsort: Afrikansk; Kinesisk (nagaimo); Elefantfot; Japansk (satsumaimo); Koreansk; Lila (ube); Vatten; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
hr-HR: Sorta jama: Afrički; Kineski (nagaimo); Slonova noga; Japanski (satsumaimo); Korejski; Ljubičasti (ube); Vodeni; Bijeli; Žuti; Ostalo
bg-BG: Сорт ямс: Африкански; Китайски (нагаимо); Слонски крак; Японски (сацумаимо); Корейски; Лилав (убе); Воден; Бял; Жълт; Други
zh-CN: 山药/芋品种: 非洲山药; 中国（长芋）; 象脚薯; 日本（萨摩芋）; 韩国山药; 紫色（参薯）; 水山药; 白色; 黄色; 其他
fr: Variété d'igname: Africain; Chinois (nagaimo); Pied d’éléphant; Japonais (satsumaimo); Coréen; Violet (ube); D’eau; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
ru: Сорт ямса: Африканский; Китайский (нагаимо); Слоновая нога; Японский (сацумаимо); Корейский; Фиолетовый (убе); Водяной; Белый; Желтый; Другой
en: Yam variety: African; Chinese (nagaimo); Elephant foot; Japanese (satsumaimo); Korean; Purple (ube); Water; White; Yellow; Other
ko: 마 품종: 아프리카산; 중국산(마); 구약감자; 일본산(고구마); 한국산; 보라색(우베); 워터 얌; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
pt-BR: Variedade de inhame: Africano; Chinês (nagaimo); Pé-de-elefante; Japonês (satsumaimo); Coreano; Roxo (ube); Água; Branco; Amarelo; Outros
es: Variedad de ñame: Africano; Chino (nagaimo); Pata de elefante; Japonés (satsumaimo); Coreano; Morado (ube); Agua; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
tr: Yam çeşidi: Afrika; Çin (nagaimo); Fil ayağı; Japon (satsumaimo); Kore; Mor (ube); Su; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
it: Varietà di igname: Africano; Cinese (nagaimo); Piede di elefante; Giapponese (satsumaimo); Coreano; Viola (ube); Acqua; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
de: Auswahl an Yams: Afrikanisch; Chinesisch (Nagaimo); Elefantenfuß; Japanisch (Satsumaimo); Koreanisch; Lila (Ube); Wasser; Weiß; Gelb; Sonstige
nb: Søtpotetvariant: Afrikansk; Kinesisk (nagaimo); Elefantfotyam; Japansk (satsumaimo); Koreansk; Lilla (ube); Vannyam; Hvit; Gul; Annet
pt-PT: Variedade de inhame: Africano; Chinês (nagaimo); Pata de elefante; Japonês (satsumaimo); Coreano; Roxo (ube); Água; Branco; Amarelo; Outro
fi: Jamssilajike: Afrikkalainen; Kiinalainen (nagaimo); Norsunjamssi; Japanilainen (satsumaimo); Korealainen; Violetti (ube); Vesi; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
zh-TW: 山藥品種: 非洲; 中國 (長芋); 蒟蒻薯; 日本 (薩摩芋); 韓國; 紫色 (紫山藥); 水山藥; 白色; 黃色; 其他